Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.190

Statute tolled by personal disability.

Unless otherwise provided in this section, if a person entitled to bring an action mentioned in this chapter, except for a penalty or forfeiture, or against a sheriff or other officer, for an escape, be at the time the cause of action accrued either under the age of eighteen years, or incompetent or disabled to such a degree that he or she cannot understand the nature of the proceedings, such incompetency or disability as determined according to chapter 11.130 RCW, or imprisoned on a criminal charge prior to sentencing, the time of such disability shall not be a part of the time limited for the commencement of action.

[ 2023 c 102 s 4; 2020 c 312 s 702; 2006 c 8 s 303; 1993 c 232 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 292 s 74; Code 1881 s 37; 1877 p 9 s 38; 1869 p 10 s 38; 1861 p 61 s 1; 1854 p 364 s 11; RRS s 169.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.

Findings—Intent—Part headings and subheadings not law—Severability—2006 c 8: See notes following RCW 5.64.010.

Purpose—Intent—1977 ex.s. c 80: "It is the purpose of the legislature in enacting this 1977 amendatory act to provide for a comprehensive revision of out-dated and offensive language, procedures and assumptions that have previously been used to identify and categorize mentally, physically, and sensory handicapped citizens. It is legislative intent that language references such as idiots, imbeciles, feeble-minded or defective persons be deleted and replaced with more appropriate references to reflect current statute law more recently enacted by the federal government and this legislature. It is legislative belief that use of the undefined term "insanity" be avoided in preference to the use of a process for defining incompetency or disability as fully set forth in chapter 11.88 RCW; that language that has allowed or implied a presumption of incompetency or disability on the basis of an apparent condition or appearance be deleted in favor of a reference to necessary due process allowing a judicial determination of the existence or lack of existence of such incompetency or disability." [ 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 1.]

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 80: "If any provision of this 1977 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 76.]

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 292: See note following RCW 26.28.010.

Adverse possession, personal disability, limitation tolled: RCW 7.28.090.